Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.130

Count of registered voters—Inactive voters.

Election officials shall not include inactive voters in the count of registered voters for the purpose of dividing precincts, determining voter turnout, or other purposes in law for which the determining factor is the number of registered voters.

[ 2011 c 10 s 14; 2009 c 369 s 13; 2003 c 111 s 210; 1994 c 57 s 40. Formerly RCW 29.10.081.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.